District of Columbia statutes.
16-1032

Records.

Any law enforcement officer who investigates an intrafamily offense shall file a written report of the incident with the District of Columbia Metropolitan Police force (“Police force”), including the law enforcement officer’s disposition of the case. The Police force shall maintain the written report.

Apr. 30, 1991, D.C. Law 8-261, § 2(c)(2), 37 DCR 5001
1981 Ed., § 16-1032.